Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 4 of this 2022 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 327.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “ADMw” means the weighted average daily membership of a school district, as  cal-
culated under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A), minus  any ADMw attributable to a virtual public charter
school, as defined in ORS 338.005.
Enrolled House Bill 4026 (HB 4026-A) Page 1
(b) “District ADM”  means the average daily membership, as defined in ORS 327.006, for
a school district, minus any ADM attributable to a virtual public charter school, as defined
in ORS 338.005.
(c) “District extended  ADMw” means the ADMw or ADMw of the prior year, whichever
is greater.
(d) “2020 wildfires” includes all  wildfires that were identified in an executive order issued
by the Governor in accordance with the Emergency Conflagration Act  under ORS 476.510 to
476.610 between August 1 and September 30, 2020.
(2) In addition to distributions made from the State School Fund and  the Student In-
vestment Account and apportionments made from the High School  Graduation and College
and Career Readiness Fund, the Department of Education shall  award grants each school
year to wildfire-impacted school districts as provided by this section.
(3) A school district may apply for a grant under this section if:
(a) The district ADM, as  compared to the district ADM for the 2019-2020 school year,
decreased for any school year occurring after the 2019-2020 school year; and
(b) The school district can demonstrate that one or more of the following occurred:
(A) One or more school buildings of the school district were damaged as  the result of the
2020 wildfires and that damage  resulted in students being displaced from the building or the
building being closed to students;
(B) Housing within the boundaries  of the school district was damaged as a result of the
2020 wildfires and that damage resulted in students being displaced from the school district;
or
(C) Any other circumstances identified by the State Board of Education by rule as being
directly related to the 2020 wildfires and causing a decrease in the district ADM.
(4)(a) Except as provided by subsection (5) of this  section, the amount of a grant awarded
under this section shall equal the greater of  the sum calculated under paragraph (b) or (c)
of this subsection.
(b) The following shall be added to determine the difference in amounts distributed  to a
school district based on ADMw:
(A) The difference between the following, in relation to distributions from  the State
School Fund under ORS 327.013:
(i) The amount that would have been distributed to the  school district for the current
school year from the State School Fund under ORS  327.013, as calculated based on the dis-
trict extended ADMw for the 2019-2020 school year; and
(ii) The amount actually distributed to the school district for the  current school year
from the State School Fund under ORS 327.013, as calculated  based on the district extended
ADMw for the current school year;
(B) The difference between the following, in relation to distributions from the  Student
Investment Account under ORS 327.195:
(i) The amount that would have  been distributed to the school district for the current
school year from  the Student Investment Account under ORS 327.195, as calculated based
on the district extended ADMw for the 2019-2020 school year; and
(ii) The amount actually  distributed to the school district for the current school year
from the Student  Investment Account under ORS 327.195, as calculated based on the district
extended ADMw for the current school year; and
(C) The difference between the  following, in relation to apportionments from the High
School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund under ORS 327.859:
(i) The amount that would have  been apportioned to the school district for the current
school year from the High School  Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund under
ORS 327.859, as calculated based  on the district extended ADMw for the 2019-2020 school
year; and
Enrolled House Bill 4026 (HB 4026-A) Page 2
(ii) The amount actually apportioned to the school district for  the current school year
from the  High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund under ORS 327.859,
as calculated based on the district extended ADMw for the current school year.
(c) The following shall be added to determine the difference in amounts distributed to  a
school district based on district ADM:
(A) The difference between the following, in relation to distributions from  the State
School Fund under ORS 327.013:
(i) The amount that would have been distributed to the  school district for the current
school year from the State School Fund under ORS  327.013, as calculated based on the dis-
trict ADM for the 2019-2020 school year; and
(ii) The amount actually distributed to the school district for the  current school year
from the State School Fund under ORS 327.013, as calculated based  on the district ADM for
the current school year;
(B) The difference between the following, in relation to distributions from the  Student
Investment Account under ORS 327.195:
(i) The amount that would have  been distributed to the school district for the current
school year from  the Student Investment Account under ORS 327.195, as calculated based
on the district ADM for the 2019-2020 school year; and
(ii) The amount actually  distributed to the school district for the current school year
from the Student  Investment Account under ORS 327.195, as calculated based on the district
ADM for the current school year; and
(C) The difference between the  following, in relation to apportionments from the High
School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund under ORS 327.859:
(i) The amount that would have  been apportioned to the school district for the current
school year from the High School  Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund under
ORS 327.859, as calculated based on the district ADM for the 2019-2020 school year; and
(ii) The amount actually apportioned  to the school district for the current school year
from the  High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund under ORS 327.859,
as calculated based on the district ADM for the current school year.
(5) The department may prorate the amount of a grant calculated under subsection  (4)
of this section if the department finds, based on rules adopted by the State Board of Educa-
tion, that only a portion of the decrease  in district ADM, as compared to the 2019-2020 school
year, is attributable to the 2020 wildfires.
(6) A school district may qualify for a grant under this section  only for school years in
which the district ADM for the current school year is less than the district ADM for the
2019-2020 school year.
(7)(a) The department shall award grants under  this section from moneys available in the
School Stabilization Subaccount for  Wildfire-impacted School Districts established under
section 4 of this 2022 Act.
(b) When awarding a grant, the department shall identify the  portion of the grant that
is attributable to:
(A) Distributions from the State School Fund under ORS 327.013;
(B) Distributions from the Student Investment Account under ORS 327.195; and
(C) Apportionments  from the High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness
Fund under ORS 327.859.
(c) A school district that receives a grant under this section shall use the  portions of the
grant for the purposes for which the portions were intended, including:
(A) Using the portion of the grant attributable to distributions from the Student Invest-
ment Account in a manner that is consistent with how the school district  uses other dis-
tributions from the account; and
Enrolled House Bill 4026 (HB 4026-A) Page 3
(B) Using the portion of the grant attributable to apportionments from the High School
Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund in a manner that is consistent with  how
the school district uses other apportionments from the fund.
(8) The State Board of Education shall  adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of this section, including adopting a reporting requirement  to ensure compliance with the
provisions of subsection (7)(c) of this section.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 2 of  this 2022 Act applies to State School Fund and Student In-
vestment Account distributions and to High School Graduation and College and Career
Readiness Fund apportionments made for the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, 2023-2024 and 2024-2025
school years.
(2) The Department of Education shall award grants under section 2 of this 2022 Act to
qualifying school districts for the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 school years.
SECTION 4.
(1) The School Stabilization Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted  School Dis-
tricts is established within the Statewide Education Initiatives Account.
(2) Interest earned on the School  Stabilization Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted School
Districts shall be credited to the subaccount.
(3) The School Stabilization Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted School Districts shall con-
sist of moneys transferred to the subaccount from the Statewide Education Initiatives  Ac-
count.
(4) Moneys in the School Stabilization Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted School Districts
are continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the purpose  described in
section 2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 5. In addition to the uses of the Statewide  Education Initiatives Account that
are authorized under ORS 327.254, the Department of  Education shall transfer $25 million
from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account to  the School Stabilization Subaccount for
Wildfire-impacted School Districts established under section 4 of this 2022  Act for the pur-
pose of awarding grants as provided by section 2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 6 (4), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds,  collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Education for programs other than  those specified in sections
5 and 14, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for all other grants, is increased by  $12,500,000, for
expenditures from the School  Stabilization Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted School Districts
established in section 4 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 7.
Sections 2 and 4 of this 2022 Act are repealed on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. (1) On July 1, 2025, the School Stabilization  Subaccount for Wildfire-
impacted School Districts established under section 4 of this 2022 Act is abolished.
(2) Any  moneys remaining in the School Stabilization Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted
School Districts on July 1, 2025, shall be  transferred to the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account.
SECTION 9. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4026 (HB 4026-A) Page 4
Passed by House February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4026 (HB 4026-A) Page 5